Wisconsin, session 2025, AB988.
do enact as follows:AB988,11Section 1. 50.373 of the statutes is created to read:AB988,2,3250.373 Video recording of surgical procedures. (1) Definitions. In 3this section:AB988,3,24(a) “Conscious sedation” is a drug-induced depression of consciousness during 1which a patient responds purposefully to verbal commands, either alone or 2accompanied by light tactile stimulation.AB988,3,53(b) “Deep sedation” is a drug-induced depression of consciousness during 4which a patient cannot be easily aroused but responds purposefully following 5repeated or painful stimulation.AB988,3,86(c) “Discharge instructions” means care instructions provided to a patient at 7or near the time of a patient’s exit or release from a surgical facility after a surgical 8procedure.AB988,3,119(d) “General anesthesia” means a temporary status commonly produced by 10the administration of certain intravenous drugs and inhaled gases that cause a 11patient to be unconscious and unable to feel pain during a medical procedure.AB988,3,1312(e) “Guardian” means the person named by the court having the duty and 13authority of guardianship.AB988,3,1514(f) “Health care provider” means a person or entity described under s. 146.81 15(1) (a) to (p) and includes any surgical facility.AB988,3,1816(g) “Incapacitated” means unable to receive and evaluate information 17effectively or to communicate decisions to such an extent that an individual lacks 18the capacity to manage his or her health care decisions.AB988,3,2119(h) “Legal custodian” means a person, other than a parent or guardian, or an 20agency to whom legal custody of a child has been transferred by a court, but does 21not include a person who has only physical custody of the child.AB988,3,2222(i) “Patient health care records” has the meaning given in s. 146.81 (4).AB988,4,223(j) “Regional anesthesia” means the use of local anesthetics to make a specific 1part of the body numb to prevent pain and allow for completion of a surgical 2procedure.AB988,4,53(k) “Surgical facility” means a hospital, as defined in s. 50.33 (2), an 4ambulatory surgical center, as defined in 42 CFR 416.2, or any other place where a 5surgical procedure is performed.AB988,4,76(L) “Surgical patient” means a patient who is scheduled to undergo a surgical 7procedure.AB988,4,118(m) “Surgical practitioner” means a physician, surgeon, or osteopath under s. 9990.01 (28), an individual licensed to practice dentistry under ch. 447, and any 10other individual who holds a valid license or other credential that allows him or her 11to perform a surgical procedure.AB988,4,1612(n) “Surgical procedure” means a surgical procedure for which a patient is 13under conscious sedation, deep sedation, regional anesthesia, or general 14anesthesia. “Surgical procedure” includes a colonoscopy or similarly invasive 15procedure if performed under conscious sedation, deep sedation, regional 16anesthesia, or general anesthesia.AB988,4,1917(o) “Surgical time out” means a final verification of details relating to a 18surgery, including at least confirmation of a surgical patient’s identity, surgical site, 19and planned procedure.AB988,5,1320(2) Option for recording. (a) 1. A surgical facility shall provide to a 21surgical patient the option to have the surgical facility or the surgical facility’s 22designee make a video recording of the patient’s surgical procedure. For purposes 23of any recording of a surgical procedure made under this subdivision, the surgical 1facility or its designee shall make a continuous color video recording, including both 2audio and video and display of the time and date. The surgical facility or its 3designee may not interrupt the video recording within the surgical suite once 4started. Separate interactions outside of the surgical suite, including preoperative 5communications and surgical time outs under subd. 2., if outside of the surgical 6suite, and discharge instructions under subd. 3., if applicable, may be separately 7recorded. All areas of the surgical suite, including entrances and exits, must be in 8view on the recording and audible. The surgical facility or its designee shall begin 9the recording within the surgical suite of a surgical procedure under this 10subdivision when preparation of the surgical suite for that surgical patient’s 11surgical procedure starts and continue the recording through the period of the 12cleanup after that procedure and until all activity in the surgical suite related to 13the procedure recorded is complete.AB988,5,18142. Any procedure recording made under this subsection shall include a 15recording, conforming to the standards described in subd. 1., of any preoperative 16communication regarding the surgical procedure between the surgical practitioner 17and the surgical patient and any surgical time out, regardless of where the 18preoperative communication or surgical time out takes place.AB988,5,23193. A surgical facility shall also provide to a surgical patient the option to have 20his or her discharge instructions, as given by the patient’s surgical practitioner or 21other health care provider, recorded. If a patient chooses to have his or her 22discharge instructions recorded, the recording may be audio only or videotaped, 23including audio, at the option of the surgical facility.AB988,6,31(b) 1. A surgical facility shall notify a surgical patient of the option to have a 2recording made under par. (a) and of the procedures, the fees, the conditions, the 3surgical practitioner’s request option, and the advance request option.AB988,6,742. If the surgical patient is a minor child, the surgical facility shall notify the 5minor child’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian of the option to have a recording 6made under par. (a) and of the procedures, the fees, the conditions, the surgical 7practitioner’s request option, and the advance request option.AB988,6,1183. If a surgical patient is incapacitated, a surgical facility shall notify a person 9authorized by the patient under s. 146.81 (5), if available, or, if not, a relative of the 10patient of the option and information under subd. 1. and allow that person to make 11a decision regarding whether to have a recording made under par. (a).AB988,6,1512(c) A surgical practitioner who is scheduled to participate in a surgical 13patient’s surgical procedure may request that the procedure be video recorded 14under the procedures described in this subsection. The surgical facility shall 15comply with the surgical practitioner’s request if all of the following are true:AB988,6,21161. The requesting surgical practitioner has informed the surgical patient or, if 17the patient is a minor, a parent, guardian, or legal custodian, of the surgical 18practitioner’s request for video recording and the reason the surgical practitioner 19has requested that recording. If the patient is incapacitated, the requesting 20surgical practitioner shall inform a person authorized by the patient under s. 21146.81 (5), if available, or, if not, a relative of the patient.AB988,6,23222. The surgical patient or other person informed under subd. 1. does not object 23to the video recording.AB988,7,61(d) A patient’s surgical practitioner or other health care provider who will 2administer a patient’s discharge instructions may request that the patient’s 3discharge instructions, as given by the surgical practitioner or other health care 4provider, be recorded under the procedures described in this subsection. The 5surgical facility shall comply with the surgical practitioner’s or other health care 6provider’s request if all of the following are true:AB988,7,1171. The requesting surgical practitioner or other health care provider has 8informed the patient or, if applicable, a parent, guardian, legal custodian, person 9authorized by the patient under s. 146.81 (5), or relative of the patient of the 10surgical practitioner’s or health care provider’s request for recording and the reason 11the surgical practitioner or other health care provider has requested that recording.AB988,7,14122. The surgical patient or, if applicable, the parent, guardian, legal custodian, 13person authorized by the patient under s. 146.81 (5), or relative of the patient does 14not object to the recording.AB988,8,315(e) 1. Except as otherwise provided under this subsection, no surgical patient 16or person on behalf of a surgical patient may disclose, unless the surgical 17practitioner or other health care provider that is a subject of the recording waives 18confidentiality, the content of a recording created under this section except to 19health care providers providing care to the surgical patient, to immediate family 20members or a person authorized by the patient under s. 146.81 (5), or to an attorney 21or an attorney’s staff for the purpose of obtaining legal advice. If legal action 22relating to the surgical procedure is taken, the surgical patient or an attorney for 23the surgical patient may disclose the recording to additional individuals if 1necessary for the case, but the recording shall be filed under seal if permitted by the 2court. In all other respects, recordings under this section shall be treated as patient 3health care records.AB988,8,1042. Notwithstanding the restrictions on disclosure under this paragraph, a 5surgical patient or a person on behalf of a surgical patient may disclose a recording 6of the surgical patient’s discharge instructions made under this section to one or 7more persons designated by the surgical patient to assist the surgical patient with 8postsurgical care, and one person designated by the surgical patient may receive a 9free copy of the recording of the surgical patient’s discharge instructions as set forth 10under sub. (10).AB988,8,22113. Notwithstanding subds. 1. and 2. and sub. (10), a surgical facility or 12surgical practitioner may, if authorization is granted under sub. (3), use a copy of a 13recording created under this section for teaching or research purposes outside the 14network of the surgical facility and if the surgical patient’s personal identifying 15information is redacted or if the surgical patient or other person authorized to 16request or consent to a recording under this section on behalf of the patient 17expressly consents, in writing, to the use and disclosure. Notwithstanding any 18other provision of this section, a surgical facility or surgical practitioner may, if not 19for teaching or research purposes outside of the network of the surgical facility, be 20permitted to use a recording made under this subsection without informed written 21confirmation under sub. (3) if the disclosure is otherwise permitted under s. 146.82 22or 146.83.AB988,9,823(3) Written confirmation. Before proceeding with a recording under sub. 1(2), a surgical facility shall obtain from the surgical patient or other person 2authorized to request or consent to a recording under sub. (2) on behalf of the 3patient, confirmation, in writing, authorizing the recording of the surgical patient’s 4surgical procedure. If a surgical facility or surgical practitioner intends to use a 5recording as described under sub. (2) (e) 3., the surgical facility shall provide 6written notice of that proposed use to the surgical patient or other person 7authorized to request or consent to a recording under sub. (2) on behalf of the 8patient, and obtain written authorization of that use of the recording.AB988,9,129(4) Equipment and technical assistance. A surgical facility shall have 10available appropriate recording equipment and technical assistance as determined 11by the department in rules promulgated under sub. (8) to comply with a request for 12a recording of a surgical patient’s surgical procedure or discharge instructions.AB988,9,1513(5) Minors. If a surgical patient is a minor child, a parent, guardian, or legal 14custodian may request that a recording be made of the minor child’s surgical 15procedure or discharge instructions under sub. (2) (a).AB988,9,2016(6) Exception for emergencies. (a) Notwithstanding sub. (2), a surgical 17facility is not required to provide the option of a video recording of a surgical 18procedure or comply with a request for video recording under this section if the 19surgical practitioner determines in the exercise of his or her professional judgment 20that either of the following is true:AB988,9,21211. Immediate surgery is necessary to avert death.AB988,9,22222. Other circumstances exist such that video recording would cause a delay 1that would create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible impairment of one or 2more of the surgical patient’s bodily functions. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab988 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab988 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB988 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB988 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB988: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting